Hawaii statutes.
§11-137 Secrecy; removal or exhibition of
ballot. No person shall look at or ask to see the contents of the ballot
or the choice of party or nonpartisan ballot of any voter, except as provided
in section 11-139 and 11-132, nor shall any person within the polling place
attempt to influence a voter in regard to whom the voter shall vote for. When
a voter is in the voting booth for the purpose of voting, no other person,
except as provided in section 11-139 and 11-132, shall be allowed to enter the
booth or to be in a position from which the person can observe how the voter
votes.

No person shall take a ballot out of the
polling place except as provided in sections 11-135 and 11-139. After voting
the voter shall leave the voting booth and deliver the voter's ballot to the
precinct official in charge of the ballot boxes. The precinct official shall
make certain that the precinct official has received the correct ballot and no
other and then shall deposit the ballot into the ballot box. No person shall look
at or ask to see the contents of the unvoted ballots. If any person having
received a ballot leaves the polling place without first delivering the ballot
to the precinct official as provided above, or wilfully exhibits the person's
ballot or the person's unvoted ballots in a special primary or primary
election, except as provided in section 11-139 and 11-132, after the ballot has
been marked, the person shall forfeit the person's right to vote, and the
chairperson of the precinct officials shall cause a record to be made of the
proceeding. [L 1970, c 26, pt of §2; am L 1972, c 158, §1; am L 1973, c 217,
§1(rr); am L 1975, c 36, §1(10); am L 1980, c 264, §1(m); gen ch 1985; am L
1993, c 97, §3]

Cross References

Distribution or sharing of electronic or digital image of a
voter's own marked ballot via social media, see §11-121.

Attorney General Opinions

Precludes "exit polling" within a polling place and
within a thousand-foot radius thereof. Att. Gen. Op. 84-4.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next